California statutes. Military and Veterans Code
(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to a member of a home who is in intermediate care or skilled nursing care and has a disability that has been rated by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs as being 70 percent or more service-connected, as determined under Part 4 of Title 38 of the Code of Federal Regulations and whose related payments made under Section 51.41 of Title 38 of the Code of Federal Regulations are considered by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs as payment in full for the member’s care.

(c) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to penalties for late fee payment.

(d) Failure to pay the required fees may be cause for the administrator to refer the
 member to collections or dismiss the member from the home.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 28, Sec. 46.   (SB 96)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1012.4.

Notwithstanding Section 1012, the department may arrange by contract or any other form of agreement with the United States Department of Veterans Affairs to do all of the following:

(a) Authorize veterans, collateral dependents, and other beneficiaries authorized by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, who are not members of a Veterans’ Home of California, to receive outpatient medical services at that home.

(b) Establish rates for reimbursement from the federal government to the State of California for outpatient services rendered by a Veterans’ Home of California to veterans who are authorized under subdivision (a).

(c) Establish and charge fees for outpatient services rendered by a Veterans’ Home of California.

(d) The outpatient services and reimbursement procedures authorized under subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) may be established for any veterans’ home established by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 28, Sec. 47.   (SB 96)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1013.

All property conveyed to and accepted by the State under the provisions of Chapter 101, Statutes of 1897, and any other property conveyed to and accepted for the home shall be the property of the home the same as though the description of such property and acceptance thereof were herein set forth.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

1023.

(a) The department may sue and be sued in any of the courts of this state. All property held by the department for a home shall be held in trust for the state and for the use and benefit of the home. The department shall manage the homes and administer their affairs, and, subject to the direction of the secretary, adopt rules and regulations for the government of the homes in conformity, as nearly as possible, to applicable state and federal rules and regulations, including, but not limited to, the United States Department of Veterans Affairs regulations.

(b) With the consent of the secretary, the Director of General Services may lease or let any real property held by the department
 for a home, and not needed for any direct or immediate purpose of the home, to any entity or person upon terms and conditions determined to be in the best interests of the home and its members. In any leasing or letting, except as provided in Section 1049, all moneys received in connection therewith shall be deposited in the General Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 61, Sec. 2.   (AB 240)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1023.1.

(a) A lease of real property held by the department for a home shall not exceed five years, unless one of the following apply:

(1) The lessee is a town, city, county, or city and county, or a political subdivision thereof, where the home is located.

(2) The lessee is a nonprofit organization that provides services exclusively for veterans of the Armed Forces of the United States and their families.

(3) The contract for the lease with the department or the Director of General Services was executed before January 1, 2021.

(b) The department or the Director of General Services and a lessee may renegotiate the terms of the contract described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), except that any terms regarding the duration or renewal of the contract shall not be extended, unless those terms meet the requirements of this section.

(c) A lease contract with any other party may be granted for a term greater than five years only with the approval of the Legislature by statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 61, Sec. 3.   (AB 240)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1023.2.

(a) The general purpose of any use, other than an easement, of real property held by the department for a home by a person or entity, other than the home or a resident of the home, shall meet all of the following criteria, as determined by the secretary:

(1) Provide substantial and direct benefits to the home and its members.

(2) Be appropriate and compatible with the nature of the home.

(3) Compensate the department in an amount that approximates fair market value, taking into consideration the value of the benefit provided to the home’s
 members and the investment by the lessee in the property development of the home.

(4) When the use contemplated carries a reasonable risk of injury or loss to the state, the home, or the members of the home, that use is appropriately insured by the lessee to cover those risks and to insure home residents, the department, and the state against liability.

(b) Each use, other than an easement, of real property held by the department for a home by a person or entity, other than the home or a resident of the home, shall be governed by a written agreement between the department or the Director of General Services and the person or entity using the real property that establishes exactly how the person or entity meets the criteria in subdivision (a).

(c) For the purposes of this section, a benefit may include any function or activity that enhances the morale, welfare, and recreation of the home’s members.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 61, Sec. 4.   (AB 240)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1025.

For those services and programs administered by the department and within the purview of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, appropriate facilities of the home shall be open at any time to the inspection of the Secretary of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or the secretary’s authorized representative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 61, Sec. 5.   (AB 240)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1030.1.

The department may enter into contracts with the United States or any agency thereof, any governmental agency, any person, or any corporation for the performance of services or manufacture of articles by disabled members of the homes. The proceeds of a contract described in this section, less the actual operating expenses, shall be paid to the individual disabled veterans who perform the services or labor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 28, Sec. 55.   (SB 96)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1030.2.

The department may enter into contracts with the United States or any agency thereof and any other governmental agency for the purpose of providing courses of vocational training for disabled veterans who have been bona fide residents of this state for five years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 490.)
-------------------------------------------

1032.

(a) (1) The department may fix a schedule of stipends for members who volunteer to support veterans home operations.

(2) A stipend is subject to the availability of funding and to the approval of the Director of Finance.

(b) A member volunteerism program pursuant to this section shall be therapeutic in nature and shall not interfere with the home’s ability to best care for and serve the member.

(c) A member shall only perform volunteer work in accordance with this section if the
 chief medical officer of the home, or their designee, determines that the member is medically appropriate for volunteer work and would receive a therapeutic benefit from volunteering.

(d) (1) A member performing volunteer work is not, and shall not displace, a civil servant or otherwise be considered an employee, or displace an employee, of the department.

(2) Rules governing a member volunteerism program shall not conflict with state or federal law defining employment.

(e) Volunteer stipends are not subject to fee collections pursuant to Section 1012.3.

(f) A member may disenroll from a member volunteerism program at any time and without notice.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 141, Sec. 2.   (SB 1530)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1033.1.

(a) The department may pay the premiums on behalf of its members who are required to participate in eligible coverage, including medical assistance provisions contained in Title XVIII and Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, from funds appropriated for the support of a home.

(b) The department may pay for copayments and deductibles for members receiving care under the limitations of the veterans’ home medical program and under the direction of the veterans’ home physician. Medical expenditures in excess of the premiums, copayments, and deductibles are the responsibility of the member.

(c) When entering a home and while residing in a home, a member is
 required to obtain and maintain basic medical insurance policies that are in accordance with all applicable state and federal laws and regulations.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 28, Sec. 59.   (SB 96)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1034.

Except money received from this state for disbursement, all moneys received by a home, or by an officer of a home, including pension and other moneys belonging to members and other trust moneys, shall be immediately paid to the administrator of the home. The administrator of each home shall forward to the State Treasurer all moneys in the administrator’s possession, except pension and other moneys belonging to members, trust moneys, and donations made to each home, together with a statement of the sources from which the moneys have been received. The moneys shall be deposited by the State Treasurer to the credit of the General Fund; provided, however, that abatements of support expenditures shall be credited to the support appropriation current at the time of collection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 126.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1035.

(a) (1) All moneys and other personal property of any member held by a home, or by its authority, or left by the member upon the premises of a home, shall, upon the death of the member, be held by the home in trust to be paid or delivered by the home upon proof determined to be proper to the administrator, directly and without probate, to the heirs of the member, except that the administrator may disburse funds of any deceased member for payment of funeral expenses or any obligation owed to any home, including the cost of any care rendered by a home in excess of the fees paid by the member to the home. Any funds of the deceased member representing the cost of care rendered by a home in excess of the fees paid by the member to the home shall be paid to the Morale,
 Welfare, and Recreation Fund.

(2) This subdivision applies only to veterans, spouses, and domestic partners becoming members of a home on or after January 1, 1984.

(b) (1) All moneys and other personal property of any member held by a home, or by its authority, or left by the member upon the premises of a home, shall, upon the death of the member, be held by the home in trust to be paid or delivered by the home upon proof determined to be proper to the administrator, directly and without probate, to the spouse, domestic partner, children, grandchildren, or father or mother of the member, except that the administrator may disburse funds of any deceased member for payment of funeral expenses or any obligation owed to any home.

(2) This subdivision applies only to veterans, spouses, and domestic
 partners who have become members of a home prior to January 1, 1984.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 28, Sec. 62.   (SB 96)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1035.05.

(a) (1) All moneys and other personal property of any member other than that described in Section 1035 shall, upon the death of the member, first be paid to the administrator for payment of funeral expenses or any obligation owed to any home remaining unpaid after the disbursement required by Section 1035 is completed; and second, in the absence of an heir or heirs or a will, pass and descend to and become the property of the state for credit to the Morale, Welfare, and Recreation Fund. If the total value of that property in the state over and above any amounts due the veteran for services in the Armed Forces of the United States or from any other employment does not exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), the home may, without procuring letters of
 administration, collect any money due the decedent, receive the property of the decedent, and have any evidences of interest, indebtedness, or right transferred to it upon furnishing the person, representative, corporation, official, or body owning the money, having custody of the property, or acting as registrar or transfer agent of the evidence of that interest, indebtedness, or right, with an affidavit showing the right of the home to receive the money or property or to have the evidences transferred. The receipt of the home shall constitute sufficient acquittance for any payment of money or delivery of property made pursuant to this section and shall fully discharge that person, representative, corporation, officer, or body from any further liability with reference thereto, without the necessity of inquiring into the truth of any of the facts stated in the affidavit. However, that payment or transfer does not preclude administration when necessary to enforce payment of the decedent’s debts, and the
 administrator may, upon proof determined to be sufficient, pay the debts directly and without administration.

(2) This subdivision applies only to veterans, spouses, and domestic partners becoming members of a home on or after January 1, 1984.

(b) (1) All moneys and other personal property of any member other than that described in Section 1035 shall, upon the death of the member, in the absence of a spouse, domestic partner, children, grandchildren, or father or mother, pass and descend to and become the property of the state for credit to the Morale, Welfare, and Recreation Fund. If the total value of that property in the State of California over and above any amounts due the veteran for services in the Armed Forces of the United States or from any other employment does not exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), the home may, without procuring letters
 of administration or awaiting probate of any will, collect any money due the decedent, receive the property of the decedent and have any evidences of interest, indebtedness, or right transferred to it upon furnishing the person, representative, corporation, official, or body owning the money, having custody of that property, or acting as registrar or transfer agent of the evidence of that interest, indebtedness, or right, with an affidavit showing the right of the home to receive that money or property or to have those evidences transferred. The receipt of the home shall constitute sufficient acquittance for any payment of money or delivery of property made pursuant to this section and shall fully discharge the person, representative, corporation, officer, or body from any further liability with reference thereto, without the necessity of inquiring into the truth of any of the facts stated in the affidavit. However, the payment or transfer does not preclude administration when necessary to enforce payment of
 the decedent’s debts, and the administrator may, upon proof determined to be sufficient, pay those debts directly and without administration.

(2) This subdivision shall apply only to veterans, spouses, and domestic partners who have become members of a home prior to January 1, 1984.

(c) For the purpose of application to this section of the provisions of the Probate Code governing distribution of property, the home shall be deemed to be a beneficiary of the decedent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 28, Sec. 63.   (SB 96)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1035.1.

(a) (1) A will executed by a member who was a member of a home at the time of death, whether executed prior or subsequent to January 1, 1984, which purports to leave any part of the member’s estate to an officer or employee of a home, unless that officer or employee would be eligible to take by intestate succession under the probate laws of this state, is void as to that provision.

(2) This subdivision shall apply only to veterans, spouses, and domestic partners becoming members of a home on or after January 1, 1984.

(b) (1) A will heretofore or hereafter executed by a member, whether executed before or after
 admission to a home, shall not be valid as to any provision therein contained which purports to dispose, either directly or indirectly, of moneys or personal property to other than the spouse, domestic partner, children, grandchildren, or father or mother of the member. This section does not apply to any veteran, spouse, or domestic partner who is not a member of a home at the time of death.

(2) This subdivision shall apply only to veterans, spouses, or domestic partners who became members of a home prior to January 1, 1984.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 28, Sec. 64.   (SB 96)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1035.2.

Any personal property held by a home pursuant to Section 1035 that the administrator determines to be of no substantial monetary value may be immediately delivered to any heir, devisee, or legatee under a will of the deceased member, or to any other interested person who makes application therefor, or if unclaimed within one year, may be destroyed or used, as the administrator directs, for the benefit of the home or its members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 28, Sec. 65.   (SB 96)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1035.3.

(a) (1) If no will or heir is discovered within two years after the death of the member, any moneys not exceeding fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) held by a home pursuant to Section 1035 and not paid or otherwise delivered to the heir or heirs or pursuant to the will of the deceased member, or otherwise disbursed by the administrator pursuant to Section 1035, shall be paid to the Morale, Welfare, and Recreation Fund.

(2) If no will or heir is discovered within five years after the death of the member, any moneys exceeding fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) held by a home pursuant to Section 1035 and not paid or otherwise delivered to the heir or heirs or pursuant to the will of the deceased member, or
 otherwise disbursed by the administrator pursuant to Section 1035, shall be paid to the Morale, Welfare, and Recreation Fund.

(3) This subdivision applies only to veterans, spouses, and domestic partners becoming members of a home on or after January 1, 1984.

(b) (1) If no spouse, domestic partner, child, grandchild, or father or mother is discovered within two years after the death of the member, any moneys not exceeding fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) held by a home pursuant to Section 1035 and not paid or otherwise delivered to the spouse, domestic partner, children, grandchildren, or father or mother, or otherwise disbursed by the administrator pursuant to Section 1035, shall be paid to the Morale, Welfare, and Recreation Fund.

(2) If no spouse, domestic partner, child, grandchild, or
 father or mother is discovered within five years after the death of the member, any moneys exceeding fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) held by a home pursuant to Section 1035 and not paid or otherwise delivered to the spouse, domestic partner, children, grandchildren, or father or mother, or otherwise disbursed by the administrator pursuant to Section 1035, shall be paid to the Morale, Welfare, and Recreation Fund.

(3) This subdivision applies only to veterans, spouses, and domestic partners who have become members of a home prior to January 1, 1984.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 28, Sec. 66.   (SB 96)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1035.4.

(a) All personal property held or received by a home pursuant to Section 1035, other than moneys or property described in Section 1035.2, which is unclaimed by, or not otherwise delivered to, the heir or heirs or pursuant to the will of a deceased member within one year after death, may be sold by the administrator by public auction or private sale. The sale shall take place at a public place in the home, and notice of the sale shall be posted in that place at least 10 days previous to the date of the sale. The proceeds of the sale shall be credited to the Morale, Welfare, and Recreation Fund.

This subdivision applies only to veterans, spouses, and domestic partners becoming members of a home on or after January 1, 1984.

(b) All personal property held or received by a home pursuant to Section 1035, other than moneys or property described in Section 1035.2, which is unclaimed by, or not otherwise delivered to, the spouse, domestic partner, children, grandchildren, or father or mother of a deceased member within one year after death, may be sold by the administrator by public auction or private sale. The sale shall take place at a public place in the home, and notice of the sale shall be posted in that place at least 10 days previous to the date of the sale. The proceeds of the sale shall be credited to the Morale, Welfare, and Recreation Fund.

This subdivision applies only to veterans, spouses, and domestic partners who have become members of a home prior to January 1, 1984.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 28, Sec. 67.   (SB 96)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1035.5.

(a) The administrator shall provide to the heirs or devisees of every deceased member who became a member of a home on or after January 1, 1984, a statement or accounting of all charges made against the member’s money or personal property under Sections 1035 to 1035.4, inclusive.

(b) Every veteran applying for membership in a home on or after January 1, 1984, shall be furnished a written explanation of the limitations and restrictions on the right to dispose of money and personal property contained in Sections 1035 to 1035.4, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 28, Sec. 68.   (SB 96)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1035.6.

(a) The administrator shall provide each member of a home with a quarterly statement or accounting of all charges for the costs of care rendered to the member in excess of the member fee, as defined in subdivision (b). The quarterly statement or accounting of charges shall include, in plain, straightforward language, avoiding technical terms as much as possible and using a coherent and easily readable style, all of the following:

(1) A statement that the charges for the excess costs of care are provided to the member for informational purposes only.

(2) A statement that, if the member is a resident of a home at the time of
 death, the home may use their money or personal property that is in possession of the home or outside the home for payment of unreimbursed costs of care.

(3) A statement that advises the member to seek counsel from a legal expert to protect their assets.

(b) “Costs of care in excess of the member fee” means all costs that are not covered by the member contribution fee, including, but not limited to, the unreimbursed costs of medical or dental services rendered to the member, either by a home or under contract with a home. The Department of Veterans Affairs shall promulgate regulations specifying the costs that are in excess of the member contribution fee and constitute the unreimbursed costs of care.

(c) The quarterly
 statement or accounting described in subdivision (a) and any notice relating to quarterly statements posted in a home shall be in 14-point font or larger.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 97.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1035.7.

(a) Upon admission to a home, the administrator of each home shall provide written notice to the member informing them of costs of care that may be incurred in excess of the member contribution fee. The notification shall do all of the following:

(1) Include an explanation of circumstances under which the member may incur costs that are in excess of the contribution fee.

(2) Specifically indicate that these excess costs of care are costs in addition to, or above and beyond, the member contribution fee.

(3) Provide examples of “excess costs of care that are
 frequently incurred by members.”

(4) Inform the member that they will receive a quarterly accounting statement of the total excess costs of care, but that the statement is provided for informational purposes only.

(5) Inform the member that, if they are a resident of a home at the time of death, the home may disburse
 their moneys or personal property for payment of unreimbursed excess costs of care.

(6) Include a statement advising the member to seek counsel from a legal expert to protect their assets.

(7) Include the terms and conditions upon which the member fees and costs can be changed.

(b) The notification shall require the signature of the member that acknowledges that they have read and understand the notification.

(c) The notification shall be written in plain, straightforward language, avoiding technical terms as much as possible, and using a coherent and easily readable style.

(d) A copy of the notification, containing all the information specified in subdivision (a) and titled in large font “NOTICE TO RESIDENTS,” shall be conspicuously posted in each home by the administrator of the home.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 98.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1036.

The members may voluntarily deposit money with a home, which the home shall receive and keep without charge as a trust fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 28, Sec. 71.   (SB 96)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1037.

The money belonging to a member and voluntarily deposited with a home may be withdrawn, in whole or in part, at the will of the member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 28, Sec. 72.   (SB 96)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1038.

All money deposited with a home for a member shall be paid to the member, on demand, upon their discharge or voluntary departure from the home. If the money is not demanded at the time of discharge or departure or within a period of two years thereafter, if the amount does not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or within a period of five years thereafter, if the amount exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000) either by the member, or, in the event of the member’s death after discharge or departure, by the member’s heirs, devisees, legatees, or qualified executor or administrator of their estate, the money shall be paid to the Morale, Welfare, and Recreation Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 99.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1038.1.

All personal property other than money left at a home by a member at the time of their discharge or voluntary departure therefrom, unclaimed within a period of one year, either by the member or, in the event of their decease after their discharge or departure, by their heirs, devisees, legatees, or qualified executor or administrator of their estate, shall be sold in the manner described in Section 1035.4 and the proceeds paid to the Morale, Welfare, and Recreation Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 100.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1038.5.

Any money deposited with a home by a member shall be credited with interest in compliance with applicable federal law and regulation, and shall be paid to the member or to their heirs, devisees, legatees, or the qualified executor or the administrator of their estate pursuant to Section 1037 or Section 1038.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 101.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1039.3.

The administrator, subject to the approval of the secretary, may accept cash donations or other gifts to be used for the welfare of the members. Cash shall be paid into trust funds as the administrator may establish, and shall be expended for promoting the welfare of the members and for the purpose designated by the donor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 28, Sec. 76.   (SB 96)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1042.

All accrued interest on money turned over to the administrator and retained by them under this chapter shall be accounted for by the home and deposited to the credit of the Morale, Welfare, and Recreation Fund and used for the common benefit of members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 102.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1042.1.

If any check is drawn upon any trust fund of a home, except checks drawn by members of the home on their own accounts, and remains unclaimed, or is not cashed, for a period of one year, it shall be canceled and the amount of the check shall be turned over to the administrator and be deposited to the credit of the Morale, Welfare, and Recreation Fund and used for the common benefit of the members of the homes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 28, Sec. 78.   (SB 96)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1043.

With the exception of officers and employees and their families, no person shall be admitted to reside in a home who is not a member eligible under Section 1012.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 61, Sec. 6.   (AB 240)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1044.

The secretary may adopt rules and regulations governing the admission of applicants and may prescribe the conditions upon which they may enter and remain with a home.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 28, Sec. 80.   (SB 96)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1044.5.

(a) A member of a home has the right to complain and otherwise exercise the freedom of expression and assembly guaranteed by the Sections 2 and 3 of Article I of the California Constitution and the First Amendment to the United States Constitution. The administrator of the home shall inform each member in writing at the time of admission of the right to complain to the administrator about home accommodations and services. A notice of the right to complain shall be posted in the home. The administrator shall also inform each member of the right to complain to the board or to the Secretary of Veterans Affairs. Each member of a home shall be encouraged and assisted, throughout the period of stay in the home, to understand and exercise the rights of freedom of expression and assembly as a
 member and as a citizen. To this end, the member may voice grievances and recommend changes in policies and services to home staff, other members, and outside representatives of the member’s choice, free from restraint, interference, coercion, discrimination, or reprisal, including retaliatory eviction.

(b) An administrator may not retaliate against any member who exercises the right to voice grievances by evicting the member. There shall be a rebuttable presumption that any eviction within 45 days of the exercise by a member of the right to voice grievances is retaliatory. This presumption does not apply in favor of a member who has failed to pay maintenance fees unless the member pays the overdue fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 28, Sec. 81.   (SB 96)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1045.

This chapter does not prevent the state from transferring the property and management of a home to the United States for a home of similar character.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 28, Sec. 82.   (SB 96)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1046.

(a) If it appears necessary or proper that a guardian or conservator of the estate of a member be appointed, the court, in its discretion, upon application of the administrator, or officer designated by the administrator, may appoint a home as guardian or conservator of the member’s estate and cause letters of guardianship or conservatorship of the estate to be issued to the home.

(b) For the purposes of this chapter, a home is a corporation and, acting through an officer designated by the administrator, may act as guardian or conservator of estates, assignee, receiver, depositary, or trustee under appointment of any court or by authority of any law of this state and may transact business in that capacity in the same manner as
 an individual, and for this purpose may sue and be sued in any court of this state.

(c) A home shall be appointed as guardian, conservator, assignee, receiver, depositary, or trustee without bond. The home shall receive reasonable fees for its expenses for filing fees and attorneys’ fees. The fees paid to the home may be used as a trust account from which may be drawn expenses for filing fees and attorneys’ fees in all estates it undertakes to administer. Whenever the balance remaining in the trust account exceeds a sum determined to be necessary by the administrator for the payment of the filing fees and attorneys’ fees incurred in the various estates, the excess shall be paid annually into the Morale, Welfare, and Recreation Fund.

(d) When acting as guardian or conservator of a member, a home may deposit the funds of the estate in the special deposit fund of the home, and may
 invest and reinvest the funds in securities which are legal investments for savings banks in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 28, Sec. 83.   (SB 96)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1047.

(a) (1) The Veterans’ Home Morale, Welfare, and Recreation Special Fund (MWR Fund) is hereby created in the State Treasury. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all funds deposited in the MWR Fund as authorized by this section shall be continuously appropriated to the department, without regard to fiscal year. All references in this chapter to the “Morale, Welfare, and Recreation Fund” or “MWR Fund” are deemed to refer to the fund created by this paragraph.

(2) The department shall distribute moneys in the MWR Fund to the homes to provide for the general welfare of the members of the homes.

(3) For the
 purposes of this subdivision, providing for the general welfare of the members of a home includes, but is not limited to, operating a canteen, base exchange, hobby shop, theater, library, or band, and payment for newspapers, chapel expenses, entertainment expenses, sports activities, celebrations, or any other function or activity that is related to the morale, welfare, and recreation of the residents that would not otherwise be paid for by the General Fund.

(4) The administrator of a home shall deposit all moneys maintained by the administrator in a Morale, Welfare, and Recreation Fund pursuant to this section as it read on January 1, 2015, into the Veterans’ Home Morale, Welfare, and Recreation Special Fund created by paragraph (1).

(5) All future moneys collected as a result of unreimbursed costs of care determinations are special state funds and shall be deposited in the MWR
 Fund.

(6) Each home shall establish an MWR Advisory Committee to provide ongoing guidance for the MWR Fund processes, including, but not limited to, budgeting, contracts, investments, expenditures, and revenues. The committee shall be comprised of the administrator or a representative and representatives of the Veterans’ Home Allied Council or resident council. 

(7) On or before July 1, 2018, the department, in consultation with the MWR Advisory Committee in each home, the Veterans’ Home Allied Council, or the resident council at each home, shall adopt regulations that carry out the intent of this section, including, but not limited to, the administration of the MWR Fund and Morale, Welfare, and Recreation Operating Funds (MWRO Funds), the process by which the homes submit annual budgets and receive allocations, the process by which the secretary shall review and act upon the
 allocation requests and requests for augmentation of those allocations.

(8) Moneys deposited in the MWR Fund are exempt from the requirements of Article 2 (commencing with Section 11270) of Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) (1) The department shall annually determine the amount for disbursement from the MWR Fund to the homes. This amount shall be disbursed proportionally by each home’s relative share of the total population of the entire veterans’ home system. All annual allocation requests and annual allocations, as well as any augmentations to those allocations, shall be made known to the members of the homes. In making allocation decisions, the department shall consider whether there are economies of scale or other savings which may be realized by aggregating home requests or otherwise while still meeting the intent
 of the homes’ requests.

(2) The secretary, in consultation with the administrator of the affected home, may augment the allocation from the MWR Fund to any veterans’ home after making a determination that this action is appropriate on the basis of factors including, but not limited to, the home’s unique age, size, population, and historical significance.

(c) Moneys in the MWR Fund shall not be expended for the following:

(1) A medical treatment or medical care of a member of a home.

(2) The maintenance or major capital improvement of the physical plant of a home.

(3) Any function, operation, or activity that is not directly related to the morale, welfare, or recreation of the members of
 the home.

(d) Appropriations from the General Fund for the purposes described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) may not be reduced for the purpose of, or to have the effect of, requiring increased expenditures from the MWR Fund for those described purposes.
